test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-iisas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - iisâs class A4â cool/viileä: # Adjective - full paradigm
     iisâs+A+Pred+Sg: iisâs
     iisâs+A+Pred+Pl: ijssâz
     iisâs+A+Attr: ijss
     iisâs+A+Comp: ijssʼsab
     iisâs+A+Superl: ijssʼsumus
     iisâs+A+Attr+Sg+Gen: ijssâz
     iisâs+A+Attr+Sg+Acc: ijssâz
     iisâs+A+Attr+Sg+Ill: ijssʼsa
     iisâs+A+Attr+Sg+Loc: ijssʼsest
     iisâs+A+Attr+Sg+Com: ijssʼsin
     iisâs+A+Attr+Ess: ijssʼsen
     iisâs+A+Attr+Par: ijssʼsed
     iisâs+A+Attr+Sg+Abe: [ijssâztaa, ijssâztää]
     iisâs+A+Attr+Pl+Nom: ijssâz
     iisâs+A+Attr+Pl+Gen: ijssʼsi
     iisâs+A+Attr+Pl+Acc: ijssʼsid
     iisâs+A+Attr+Pl+Ill: ijssʼsid
     iisâs+A+Attr+Pl+Loc: ijssʼsin
     iisâs+A+Attr+Pl+Com: ijssʼsivuiʹm
     iisâs+A+Attr+Pl+Abe: [ijssʼsitaa, ijssʼsitää]
